District of Columbia statutes.
42-1502

Where several are jointly seized of lands to use of any so seized, latter deemed to have possession and seizin alone.

Where divers and many persons be, or hereafter shall happen to be jointly seized of and in any lands, tenements, rents, reversions, remainders, or other hereditaments, to the use, confidence, or trust of any of them that be so jointly seized, in every such case those person or persons which have or hereafter shall have any such use, confidence, or trust in any such lands, tenements, rents, reversions, remainders, or hereditaments, shall from henceforth have, and be deemed and adjudged to have only to him or them that have, or hereafter shall have such use, confidence, or trust, such estate, possession, and seizin, of and in the same lands, tenements, rents, reversions, remainders, and other hereditaments, in like nature, manner, form, condition, and course, as he or they had before in the use, confidence, or trust of the same lands, tenements, or hereditaments; saving and reserving to all and singular persons, and bodies politic, their heirs, and successors, other than those person or persons which be seized, or hereafter shall be seized of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments, to any use, confidence, or trust, all such right, title, entry, interest, possession, rents, and action, as they or any of them had, or might have had before the year 1535.

27 Hen. 8, ch. 10, § 2, 1535
Kilty’s Rep. 231
Alex. Br. Stat. 294
Comp. Stat. D.C., 537, § 2
1981 Ed., § 45-1102.
1973 Ed., § 45-1202.